Mississippi, session 2026, SB2754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 93-11-65, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-11-65.  (1)  (a)  In addition to the right to proceed under Section 93-5-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, and in addition to the remedy of habeas corpus in proper cases, and other existing remedies, the chancery court of the proper county shall have jurisdiction to entertain suits for the custody, care, support and maintenance of minor children and to hear and determine all such matters, and shall, if need be, require bond, sureties or other guarantee to secure any order for periodic payments for the maintenance or support of a child.  In the event a legally responsible parent has health insurance available to him or her through an employer or organization that may extend benefits to the dependents of such parent, any order of support issued against such parent may require him or her to exercise the option of additional coverage in favor of such children as he or she is legally responsible to support.  Proceedings may be brought by or against a resident or nonresident of the State of Mississippi, whether or not having the actual custody of minor children, for the purpose of judicially determining the legal custody of a child.  All actions herein authorized may be brought in the county where the child is actually residing, or in the county of the residence of the party who has actual custody, or of the residence of the defendant.  Process shall be had upon the parties as provided by law for process in person or by publication, if they be nonresidents of the state or residents of another jurisdiction or are not found therein after diligent search and inquiry or are unknown after diligent search and inquiry; provided that the court or chancellor in vacation may fix a date in termtime or in vacation to which process may be returnable and shall have power to proceed in termtime or vacation.  Provided, however, that if the court shall find that both parties are fit and proper persons to have custody of the children, and that either party is able to adequately provide for the care and maintenance of the children, the chancellor may consider the preference of a child of twelve (12) years of age or older as to the parent with whom the child would prefer to live in determining what would be in the best interest and welfare of the child.  The chancellor shall place on the record the reason or reasons for which the award of custody was made and explain in detail why the wishes of any child were or were not honored. (b)  An order of child support shall specify the sum to be paid weekly or otherwise.  In addition to providing for support and education, the order shall also provide for the support of the child prior to the making of the order for child support, and such other expenses as the court may deem proper. (c)  The court may require the payment to be made to the custodial parent, or to some person or corporation to be designated by the court as trustee, but if the child or custodial parent is receiving public assistance, the Department of Human Services shall be made the trustee. (d)  The noncustodial parent's liabilities for past education and necessary support and maintenance and other expenses are limited to a period of one (1) year next preceding the commencement of an action. (2)  Provided further, that where the proof shows that both parents have separate incomes or estates, the court may require that each parent contribute to the support and maintenance of the children in proportion to the relative financial ability of each. (3)  Whenever the court has ordered a party to make periodic payments for the maintenance or support of a child, but no bond, sureties or other guarantee has been required to secure such payments, and whenever such payments as have become due remain unpaid for a period of at least thirty (30) days, the court may, upon petition of the person to whom such payments are owing, or such person's legal representative, enter an order requiring that bond, sureties or other security be given by the person obligated to make such payments, the amount and sufficiency of which shall be approved by the court.  The obligor shall, as in other civil actions, be served with process and shall be entitled to a hearing in such case. (4)  When a charge of abuse or neglect of a child first arises in the course of a custody or maintenance action pending in the chancery court pursuant to this section, the chancery court may proceed with the investigation, hearing and determination of such abuse or neglect charge as a part of its hearing and determination of the custody or maintenance issue as between the parents, as provided in Section 43-21-151, notwithstanding the other provisions of the Youth Court Law.  The proceedings in chancery court on the abuse or neglect charge shall be confidential in the same manner as provided in youth court proceedings, and the chancery court shall appoint a guardian ad litem in such cases, as provided under Section 43-21-121 for youth court proceedings, who shall be an attorney.  In determining whether any portion of a guardian ad litem's fee shall be assessed against any party or parties as a cost of court for reimbursement to the county, the court shall consider each party's individual ability to pay.  Unless the chancery court's jurisdiction has been terminated, all disposition orders in such cases for placement with the Department of Human Services shall be reviewed by the court or designated authority at least annually to determine if continued placement with the department is in the best interest of the child or the public. (5)  Each party to a paternity or child support proceeding shall notify the other within five (5) days after any change of address.  In addition, the noncustodial and custodial parent shall file and update, with the court and with the state case registry, information on that party's location and identity, including social security number, residential and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, photograph, driver's license number, and name, address and telephone number of the party's employer.  This information shall be required upon entry of an order or within five (5) days of a change of address. (6)  In any case subsequently enforced by the Department of Human Services pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, the court shall have continuing jurisdiction. (7)  In any subsequent child support enforcement action between the parties, upon sufficient showing that diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of a party, due process requirements for notice and service of process shall be deemed to be met with respect to the party upon delivery of written notice to the most recent residential or employer address filed with the state case registry. (8)  (a)  The duty of support of a child terminates upon the emancipation of the child.  Unless otherwise provided for in the underlying child support judgment, emancipation shall occur when the child: (i)  Attains the age of twenty-one (21) years, or (ii)  Marries, or (iii)  Joins the military and serves on a full-time basis, or (iv)  Is convicted of a felony and is sentenced to incarceration of two (2) or more years for committing such felony; * * * or (b)  Unless otherwise provided for in the underlying child support judgment, the court may determine that emancipation has occurred and no other support obligation exists when the child: (i)  Discontinues full-time enrollment in school having attained the age of eighteen (18) years, unless the child is disabled, or (ii)  Voluntarily moves from the home of the custodial parent or guardian, establishes independent living arrangements, obtains full-time employment and discontinues educational endeavors prior to attaining the age of twenty-one (21) years, or (iii)  Cohabits with another person without the approval of the parent obligated to pay support; * * * and (c)  The duty of support of a child who is incarcerated but not emancipated shall be suspended for the period of the child's incarceration. (9)  Unless otherwise provided for in the underlying child support judgment and notwithstanding the termination of support under subsection (8) of this section, on or after the effective date of this act, the duty of support for a child who is incapable of self-support by reason of a physical or mental disability, if the disability existed during the adult child's minority, may continue past the child's anticipated age of majority if: (a)  A hearing is held by the court; and (b)  The adult child is placed in a conservatorship or a less restrictive alternative authorized under Chapter 20, Title 93. ( * * *910)  A determination of emancipation does not terminate any obligation of the noncustodial parent to satisfy arrearage existing as of the date of emancipation; the total amount of periodic support due prior to the emancipation plus any periodic amounts ordered paid toward the arrearage shall continue to be owed until satisfaction of the arrearage in full, in addition to the right of the person for whom the obligation is owed to execute for collection as may be provided by law. ( * * *1011)  Upon motion of a party requesting temporary child support pending a determination of parentage, temporary support shall be ordered if there is clear and convincing evidence of paternity on the basis of genetic tests or other evidence, unless the court makes written findings of fact on the record that the award of temporary support would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case. ( * * *1112)  Custody and visitation upon military temporary duty, deployment or mobilization shall be governed by Section 93-5-34. SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature that should a court determine to continue the duty of support for a child past the child's age of majority under Section 93-11-65(9), the court may: (a)  Order that the duty to support a child continues past the anticipated age of majority if the child has a disability which was present during the child's minority that prevents the child from living independently unless the child is a long-term patient in a facility owned or operated by the State of Mississippi; (b)  Order, modify or leave in place previous orders regarding custody, visitation, payment of medical expenses or any other matters regarding the health, maintenance, education and welfare of the child with a disability; and (c)  Consider the child's receipt of and eligibility for public benefits and community services and resources in determining the award of support. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.